Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 26 Penalties

17-26-1.
Felonies.

Every person who is convicted of any offense under this title which has been classified by the general assembly as a felony shall be imprisoned for a term of not more than ten (10) years, or fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both, for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 26; P.L. 1985, ch. 462, § 2.

17-26-2.
Misdemeanors.

Every person who is convicted of any offense under this title which has been classified by the general assembly as a misdemeanor shall be imprisoned for a term not exceeding one year, or fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 462, § 2.

17-26-3.
Petty misdemeanors.

Every person who is convicted of any offense under this title which has been classified by the general assembly as a petty misdemeanor shall be imprisoned for a term not exceeding six (6) months, or fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 1.